Louisiana, session 2026, HB1074.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:90(F) and 90.3(L) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§90. Gambling
* * *
F. The authorization and operation of a lottery courier service, as provided
in R.S. 47:9008, shall not be considered gambling for the purposes of this Section.
* * *
§90.3. Gambling by computer
* * *
L. Ordering lottery tickets through a lottery courier service via the Internet,
as provided in R.S. 47:9008, shall not be considered gambling by computer for the
purposes of this Section. Fulfillment of lottery courier service orders via the
Internet, as provided in R.S. 47:9008, shall also not be considered gambling by
computer for the purposes of this Section.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2237 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1074
Section 2. R.S. 47:9008(A)(8) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
47:9001(C), 9002(31), 9008(B) and (D), and 9054(A)(9) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§9001. Statement of purpose and intent
* * *
C. The legislature finds that operating a lottery in a manner that maximizes
revenue from lottery games, while operating with integrity and dignity, serves the
best interests of the state.
§9002. Definitions
* * *
(31) "Courier service" means a person or organization that purchases and
stores a lottery ticket on behalf of a customer located in this state and delivers the
lottery ticket, or the prize from the lottery ticket, to the customer in this state as a for-
profit service.
* * *
§9008. Board; lottery games; regulation
A. The board may adopt rules for the conduct of specific lottery games and
operations, including but not limited to rules specifying:
* * *
(8) The manner and amount of compensation to lottery retailers, except all
compensation shall be uniform.
(a) The board shall establish a base retailer commission for retail sales at five
percent of gross sales.
(b) The board shall review and adjust the base retailer commission amount
to apply for the twelve-month period commencing on July first, or on another date
within the year in which the adjustment is made. In the review, the base retailer
commission shall be revised upward at least one-quarter percent for each eight
million dollar increase in gross sales over the prior fiscal year. Base retailer
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2237 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1074
commissions shall not be lowered pursuant to this Subparagraph and shall not exceed
a maximum of seven percent for base commission for retail sales.
(c) Sales by licensed retailers to lottery couriers to fulfill customer orders in
this state shall be subject to a base retailer commission of one percent lower than the
base commission awarded for general lottery ticket sales. That remaining one
percent shall be reserved for the benefit of retailers who do not participate in courier
sales, and allocated in accordance with this Section.
(i) No less than once every three months, the board shall evaluate the
proportionate sales of retail lottery sales that exclude fulfillment of lottery courier
orders.
(ii) The board shall calculate each licensed retailer's proportionate share of
lottery retail sales that exclude fulfillment of lottery courier orders.
(iii) The board shall divide the one percent retained base retailer commission
for lottery courier sales on a pro rata basis and distribute the funds representing the
retained one percent commission among licensed retailers that do not participate in
fulfillment of lottery courier orders.
(d) The board shall further adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act that allow for additional selling bonuses, cash incentives, and
promotional incentives for retailers as may be necessary to ensure a robust and
effective retailer base for lottery sales within the state.
* * *
B. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act to regulate licensed lottery retailers that sell tickets to a courier
service to fulfill an order for lottery tickets placed by a courier service customer in
this state. The rules shall authorize a courier service to fulfill orders for lottery
tickets placed by adult customers located within this state pursuant to the terms set
forth in this Section. The rules adopted pursuant to this provision shall include but
not be limited to the following:
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2237 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1074
(1) A licensed retailer that seeks to sell lottery tickets to a courier service in
this state shall do so through a written agreement between the courier service and the
licensed retailer.
(2) The licensed retailer shall disclose the existence and substance of a
written agreement between the licensed retailer and the courier service within five
business days of the execution of such agreement.
(3) A written agreement between a licensed retailer and a courier service to
fulfill courier service orders for the sale of lottery tickets shall contain the following
terms:
(a) A requirement that a courier service may only accept orders from a
customer for draw and scratch games that are also available for sale at licensed retail
locations.
(b) A requirement that a courier service deliver scanned images of lottery
tickets ordered through the courier service to ordering customers.
(c) A requirement that a courier service only accept a lottery ticket order
from a customer who has been determined to be physically located within this state
and not on federally recognized tribal grounds at the time of the customer order.
(d) A requirement that a courier service employ effective age verification
software that allows a customer who is of lawful age to purchase a lottery ticket
pursuant to R.S. 47:9070 to order a lottery ticket through the courier service.
(e) A requirement that a courier service securely store a lottery ticket
purchased on behalf of a customer until the prize for the ticket is redeemed at retail
by the courier service, or until the lottery ticket retrieved by or delivered to the
customer for the customer to redeem the prize through the corporation.
(f) A requirement that a courier service maintain appropriate controls for
responsible play, including the use of daily, weekly, or monthly limits that may be
reduced by the customer, as well as self-exclusion capabilities. The agreement shall
also require advertisements and communications from the courier service to comply
with applicable responsible gaming advertising guidelines.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2237 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1074
(g) A requirement that a courier service only purchase tickets from the
licensed retailer at dedicated terminals which shall be provided by the corporation
to the licensed retail location.
(h) A requirement that the courier service only pay for lottery tickets
purchased from the licensed retailer using methods of purchase authorized by the
corporation for the purchase of lottery tickets at retail, including but not limited to
cash or automated clearing house transfers.
(i) A provision allowing a courier service to assess a fee to a customer for
the cost of order fulfillment and storage. Notwithstanding R.S. 47:9057 or any
contrary rule or provision, any courier service or convenience fee that is disclosed
to the customer in advance of an order is permissible and is not to be construed as
adding to the price of the lottery ticket.
(j) A requirement that the courier service annually obtain a report from a
firm nationally recognized for providing audit, testing, or certification services that
certify that the courier is in compliance with the written agreement between the
courier service and the retailer, which the courier service shall provide to the retailer
upon request.
(4) In adopting rules and regulating the conduct of retailers who contract
with lottery couriers to fulfill customer lottery ticket orders within this state, the
board shall direct the corporation to use existing rules and procedures to the greatest
extent possible to authorize lottery couriers and implement lottery courier services
pursuant to this Section without undue delay.
* * *
D. Consistent with the goal to maximize revenues for the state, the board
shall direct the corporation to review and update its processes relating to the
approval, sale, adoption, and marketing of lottery scratch tickets at denominations
above twenty dollars. The corporation shall provide the board with a report that
creates actionable timeframes for expanding scratch ticket availability and increasing
scratch ticket denominations available for sale by licensed retailers within the state.
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2237 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1074
§9054. Content of retailer contracts; contract cancellation by president
A. Any contract executed by the corporation pursuant to this Subtitle shall
specify the reasons for which any contract may be cancelled, suspended, revoked,
or terminated by the corporation, which reasons shall include but not be limited to:
* * *
(9) Failure by a retailer to comply with the rules and regulations adopted by
the corporation relating to sales of tickets to lottery couriers.
* * *
Section 3. Beginning March 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the board shall review
and adjust the base retailer commission as required by R.S. 47:9008(A)(8)(b), as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act.
Section 4. Within ninety days of the effective date of R.S. 47:9008(D), and annually
thereafter, the corporation shall provide the board with the report described in R.S.
47:9008(D), as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
Section 5. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
renumber the new entry of R.S. 47:9002(31), as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, to ensure
that definitions are listed in alphabetical order.